Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1043.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 910(a) of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, is amended to read:Section 910. Continuing medical education.(a) Rules and regulations.--Each licensure board shall promulgate and enforce regulations consistent with the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Medical Practice Act, or the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, as appropriate, in establishing requirements of continuing medical education for individuals licensed to practice medicine and surgery without restriction as a condition for renewal of their licenses. In addition to the requirements of this subsection, each licensure board shall require at least one hour of continuing medical education on nutrition for each biannual licensure renewal for individuals licensed to practice medicine and surgery. Such regulations shall include any fees necessary for the licensure board to carry out its responsibilities under this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1043PN1231 - 2 - 1234567891011121314